Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB748.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6144YC (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 499C.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. A certification concerning the payment of 3 dues, fees, or assessments that states whether the dues, fees, 4 or assessments are paid in full or delinquent, and identifies 5 any known future dues, fees, or assessments. 6 Sec. 2. Section 499C.2, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 3. A unit owners association, a unit owners associationâs 9 designee, or a unit owners associationâs management company may 10 charge a reasonable fee for all records and documents provided 11 under this section . The fee shall not exceed the estimated 12 cost of production or reproduction of the records or documents. 13 Upon request, the unit owner or the unit ownerâs authorized 14 agent shall be provided reasonable documentation supporting 15 the fee charged to ensure the fee does not exceed the cost of 16 production or reproduction of the records or documents. 17 Sec. 3. Section 558A.4A, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 5. Except as otherwise required by law, a home inspector 20 shall not deliver a home inspection report to any person other 21 than the client of the home inspector without the clientâs 22 consent. The seller shall have the right, upon request, to 23 receive without charge a copy of a home inspection report from 24 the person for whom it was prepared from the buyer or the 25 buyerâs authorized agent those portions of a home inspection 26 report that relate to the remediation requests made by the 27 buyer or the buyerâs authorized agent. If the buyer or the 28 buyerâs authorized agent fails to provide the applicable 29 portions of the inspection report to the seller, the seller may 30 cancel the purchase contract for the inspected property without 31 penalty . 32